Utah statutes.
39-1-2.   Militia divided into two parts.

(1)  The militia of this state shall be divided into two parts: the National Guard and the unorganized militia.

(2)  The National Guard shall consist of:

(a)  a joint forces headquarters commanded by the adjutant general and authorized a general officer as deputy commander;

(b)  a department for army commanded by a general officer; and

(c)  a department for air commanded by a general officer.

(3)  The numerical strength, composition, distribution, organization, arms, uniforms, equipment, training and discipline of the National Guard shall be prescribed by the governor in conformity with the laws and regulations of the United States and the laws of this state.

(4)  The unorganized militia shall consist of all members of the militia not members of the National Guard.



Amended by Chapter 65, 2005 General Session

